Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 10. Corporations

§ 1. Creation.

The legislature shall provide for the organization of corporations by general law. All laws relating to corporations may be altered, amended or repealed by the legislature at any time when necessary for the public good and general welfare, and all corporations doing business in this state may as to such business be regulated, limited or restrained by law not in conflict with the constitution of the United States.

Cross references. —

As to corporations generally, see title 17.

Corporations organized under territorial law. —

When corporation organized under territorial law accepted state constitution, constitutional provisions became part of charter of corporation as effectively as though they were incorporated in the charter. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Territorial corporation which continued year after year, with stockholders' consent, to operate after statehood, became subject to the provisions of the constitution. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Agricultural college. —

Legislature had power to repeal the act establishing the agricultural college, which was located by a vote of the people. State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1906), aff'd, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

Police powers. —

All contract and property rights exist subject to reasonable exercise of state's police powers. Salt Creek Transp. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 37 Wyo. 488, 263 P. 621,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1928).

Statute regulating transportation companies was reasonable exercise of police power not impairing contract as to certificate of convenience and necessity granted carrier. Salt Creek Transp. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 37 Wyo. 488, 263 P. 621,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1928).

Authority to change contract. —

This section, to which incorporators impliedly assented, gives specific authority that contract entered into between them with state and corporation, and between themselves, could be changed by legislature and by stockholders or authorized corporate officers. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Rights of dissenting stockholder. —

Legislative power to change corporation laws does not permit change in charter or articles of incorporation over stockholder's dissent if change is fundamental or unreasonable, but if not, then law authorizing it and stockholders' or officers' action pursuant thereto does not violate dissenter's constitutional rights. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Control by state.

All powers and franchises of corporations are derived from the people and are granted by their agent, the government, for the public good and general welfare, and the right and duty of the state to control and regulate them for these purposes is hereby declared. The power, rights and privileges of any and all corporations may be forfeited by willful neglect or abuse thereof. The police power of the state is supreme over all corporations as well as individuals.

Test of statute enacted pursuant to police power. —

Purpose of a statute enacted pursuant to police power must be within scope and furtherance of police power to be valid, and the means adopted must be reasonable and appropriate for accomplishment of ends in view. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Economic welfare of the people. —

The legislature, in the exercise of the police power, may make provision for the economic welfare of the people generally. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Contract and property rights exist subject to state's police powers.

Salt Creek Transp. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 37 Wyo. 488, 263 P. 621,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1928).

Reasonable restrictions on contract rights allowable. —

Generally, the making of contracts shall be free from governmental interference, but contract rights are not absolute. Where restrictions are placed on such rights — through an exercise of the police power of the legislature — it must be determined whether they are reasonable and within the scope of the police power. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

Use of indemnity agreements restricted. —

Since indemnity agreements are widely used in construction-related industries, the legislature may consider that such use removes or reduces the incentives to protect workers and others from personal injury and for these reasons declare them to be against public policy. To attempt to achieve such purposes by voiding certain indemnity agreements is certainly reasonable and within the purpose of the police power. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

Limitation upon police power. —

The police power is not unlimited, but is definitely limited by the constitutional provision for due process of law. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Statute regulating transportation companies was reasonable exercise of police power

not impairing contract as to certificate of convenience and necessity granted carrier. Salt Creek Transp. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 37 Wyo. 488, 263 P. 621,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1928).

Cited

in

Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 3. Forfeited charters. [Executed.]

Editor's notes. —

This section was executed and is now obsolete due to lapse of time.

§ 4. Damages for personal injuries or death; worker's compensation.

No law shall be enacted limiting the amount of damages to be recovered for causing the injury or death of any person.

Any section of this constitution to the contrary notwithstanding, for any civil action where a person alleges that a health care provider's act or omission in the provision of health care resulted in death or injury, the legislature may by general law:

Mandate alternative dispute resolution or review by a medical review panel before the filing of a civil action against the health care provider

Any contract or agreement with any employee waiving any right to recover damages for causing the death or injury of any employee shall be void. As to all extrahazardous employments the legislature shall provide by law for the accumulation and maintenance of a fund or funds out of which shall be paid compensation as may be fixed by law according to proper classifications to each person injured in such employment or to the dependent families of such as die as the result of such injuries, except in case of injuries due solely to the culpable negligence of the injured employee. The fund or funds shall be accumulated, paid into the state treasury and maintained in such manner as may be provided by law. Monies in the fund shall be expended only for compensation authorized by this section, for administration and management of the Worker's Compensation Act, debt service related to the fund and for workplace safety programs conducted by the state as authorized by law. The right of each employee to compensation from the fund shall be in lieu of and shall take the place of any and all rights of action against any employer contributing as required by law to the fund in favor of any person or persons by reason of the injuries or death. Subject to conditions specified by law, the legislature may allow employments not designated extrahazardous to be covered by the state fund at the option of the employer. To the extent an employer elects to be covered by the state fund and contributes to the fund as required by law, the employer shall enjoy the same immunity as provided for extrahazardous employments. (As amended by Laws 1913, ch. 79; Laws 1986, Sp. Sess. Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 51; as amended by Laws 1998, Sp. Sess. Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, § 1; as amended by Laws 2004, House Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 2.)

Cross references. —

For provision that contracts exempting employer from liability for personal injuries to employee shall be void, see art. 19, § 7, Wyo. Const. and §

27-1-105

.

As to action for wrongful death, see §§

1-38-101

and

1-38-102

.

As to worker's compensation, see chapter 14 of title 27.

As to the extrahazardous occupations to which worker's compensation applies, see §

27-14-108

.

Amendments. —

Laws 2004, House Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 2, § 1 authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was approved by vote of the people at the general election held November 2, 2004, and certified November 10, 2004.

The 2004 amendment allows the Wyoming legislature to enact laws requiring alternative dispute resolution or medical panel review before a person files a lawsuit against a health care provider for injury or death.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., House Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 1, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment to the electors of the state of Wyoming at the next general election for approval or rejection to become valid as a part of the constitution if ratified by a majority of the electors.

The proposed amendment would have allowed the Wyoming legislature to enact laws limiting the amount of damages for noneconmic loss that could be awarded for injury or death caused by a health care provider. The amendment was not ratified by a majority of electors at the November 2, 2004 general election.

No change has been made in the common-law right of a workman to sue a co-employee.

Markle v. Williamson, 518 P.2d 621,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1974).

Legislature cannot limit amount of recovery for wrongful death. —

The legislature by virtue of this section cannot limit the amount of recovery in a wrongful death action. Muir v. Haggerty, 77 Wyo. 280, 314 P.2d 948,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1957).

Limitation of $5,000 under the territorial statute was removed by this section and the wrongful injury or death statute. Danielson v. Donmopray, 57 F.2d 565, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1134 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Prohibition of section is prospective. —

This section prohibits only future legislation limiting the amount of damages to be recovered for causing injury or death of any person, and does not, therefore, repeal or abrogate any statute previously enacted. Burton v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 18 Wyo. 362, 107 P. 391,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1910), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 362, 112 P. 841,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1911).

A statutory provision limiting the amount of recovery for death to $5,000 was not repealed or repugnant to the constitution on its adoption. Mestas v. Diamond Coal & Coke Co., 12 Wyo. 414, 76 P. 567,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1904).

Abolition of action by miner not violative of due process. —

Abolishing actions by an injured miner against his employer for negligence does not constitute a taking of property without due process of law. Jackson v. Dravo Corp., 603 F.2d 156,

1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 12565

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Court authorized to determine liability. —

The statement in this section that “[n]o law shall be enacted limiting the amount of damages” does not limit the authority of any court in the state of Wyoming to determine liability. Stockwell v. Parker Drilling Co., 733 P.2d 1029,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 409

(Wyo. 1987).

Laws limiting “right to recover” not prohibited. —

The plain language of this section's first sentence and its ordinary meaning reflects its prohibition to be against only laws limiting the “amount of damages,” and not laws limiting the “right to recover.” Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982).

Legislature may limit types of actions brought against state. —

This section may prevent the legislature from imposing arbitrary limits on damages, but it does not prevent limitations on the types of actions which may be brought against the state. Troyer v. Department of Health & Social Servs., Div. of Vocational Rehabilitation, 722 P.2d 158,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 589

(Wyo. 1986).

The purpose of the 1914 amendment

was to authorize the establishment of an industrial accident fund, financed by industry and underwritten by the state, from which injured employees and the dependents of deceased employees who were injured or killed in covered employment could recover stipulated sums from the compensation fund without regard to fault, save only those instances where injury or death occurred through the culpability of the worker. Baker v. Wendy's of Montana, 687 P.2d 885,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1984).

1914 amendment relating to worker's compensation takes precedence over earlier

art. 9, § 4,

Wyo. Const., if they cannot be harmonized.
Parker v. Energy Dev. Co., 691 P.2d 981,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1984).

Compensation benefits take place of tort suit. —

An injured miner whose employer has complied with the Wyoming law regarding worker's compensation does not have an independent cause of action against his employer as compensation benefits take the place thereof. Jackson v. Dravo Corp., 603 F.2d 156,

1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 12565

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Intent behind this section is that worker's compensation benefits are to be in lieu of, and take the place of, “any and all” causes of action which an injured or deceased workman might otherwise have against his employer, assuming, that the employer is a participating member of the compensation fund. Jackson v. Dravo Corp., 603 F.2d 156, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 12565 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Employee's agreement to submit disputes concerning injury and workers' compensation benefits to arbitration was not unenforceable under this section, where agreement specifically provided for recovery of benefits from employer's workers' compensation plan, and employee in fact received benefits under the plan. Gibson v. Wal-Mart Stores, Inc., 181 F.3d 1163,

1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 14114

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1999).

Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act provided exclusive remedy for death of employee killed in mining accident, and therefore survivors and personal representative could not maintain wrongful death action against mining operator, despite allegations of negligence and safety violations by operator. Anderson v. Solvay Minerals, Inc., 3 P.3d 236,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18, 366 P.3d 521,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2016).

Classifications based on improper criteria of legitimacy or illegitimacy constitute denial of equal protection

in the application of Wyoming's workers' compensation laws. Bowers v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

No legitimate state interest is served by discrimination between legally married spouses,

for recovery of death benefits under Wyoming's workers' compensation laws. Bowers v. Wyoming State Treasurer, 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

Neither this section nor §

27-14-104

has any connection with pension plans

and were irrelevant where an employee's long term disability payments pursuant to an insurance contract were reduced by a sum equal to the worker's compensation award given to the employee.
Bunney v. Standard Oil Co., 571 P.2d 981,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1977).

Contract in lieu of compensation without consideration. —

Injured workman cannot legally surrender right to reopen original workmen's compensation award and there is no consideration for contract between employer and employee that employer would employ injured worker for life in lieu of further compensation. Horvath v. Sheridan-Wyoming Coal Co., 58 Wyo. 211, 131 P.2d 315,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1942).

“Contract for hire” is not necessary prerequisite to defendant's status as “employer”

for purposes of workers' compensation immunity. In the absence of a joint employment dispute, an employee who agrees to be “employed” without a contract but is mistaken about the identity of his actual employer is not necessarily prejudiced, but must affirmatively demonstrate either that the employee suffered harm because of being mistaken about the identity of his employer, or that his mistake about the employer's identity was due to bad faith or fraud by the employer. Clark v. Industrial Co., 818 P.2d 626,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1991).

Rig welder, subject to control by employer, deemed covered employee. —

Where claimant was a rig welder — meaning that he had a truck unit welder and hired out within the oil patch industry on an hourly basis for himself and his truck, which supplied all equipment required to perform general welding services —, he was engaged in some prefabrication and assembly completed in the general contractor's yard prior to field installation (after welding-skill testing by the owner) when injured, and the general contractor attempted to treat him differently than it did other employees with respect to federal income tax withholding, federal social security, unemployment, worker's compensation, health insurance and retirement plans, but in all other aspects he was subject to the same kind of control as any other employee, the trial court's decision that he was a covered employee was affirmed, although a document designated him as an independent contractor. Flint Eng'g & Constr. Co. v. Richardson, 726 P.2d 511,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 624

(Wyo. 1986).

“Solely” construed. —

The word “solely,” as used herein, is a word of exclusion, and may be used to mean “only” or “exclusively,” and as used must be given a reasonable meaning. Hotelling v. Fargo-Western Oil Co., 33 Wyo. 240, 238 P. 542,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1925).

Culpable negligence. —

Before workmen's compensation award can be refused on grounds of workman's culpable negligence, it must appear by preponderance of evidence that injury was due solely thereto. Fuhs v. Swenson, 58 Wyo. 293, 131 P.2d 333,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1942).

Where substantial evidence exists to support finding that injury was caused by serious and willful misconduct or culpable negligence of workman in violating rule established for his protection, disallowance of claim is required. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1943).

Culpable negligence which forfeits recovery under Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act means improper conduct of grave and aggravated character—it means misconduct which recklessly disregards consequences to himself by him who is guilty of it. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1943).

Accident which places employee beyond pale of law for making workmen's compensation awards must be due solely to culpable negligence of injured employee. Fuhs v. Swenson, 58 Wyo. 293, 131 P.2d 333,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1942).

Only exception when compensation shall not be paid is in the case where injuries are due “solely to the culpable negligence” of the workman affected, and no other limitation appears to be established by the language used. Baldwin v. Byrne, 53 Wyo. 519, 86 P.2d 1095,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(1939).

Where culpable negligence of workman took him outside scope of employment and made him at time of injury an intruder or trespasser, his widow could not recover compensation for his resulting death. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203, 1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Wyo. 1943).

Employee who lighted match to inspect contents of diesel fuel tank was not culpably negligent under established evidence and his action was not sole cause of explosion resulting in his injury, thus permitting recovery under Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act. Fuhs v. Swenson, 58 Wyo. 293, 131 P.2d 333, 1942 Wyo. LEXIS 24 (Wyo. 1942).

Where coal miner in violation of rule established for his protection and kept alive by warning signs and oral warnings returned to working place by forbidden, dangerous route, evidence established willful misconduct or culpable negligence. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203, 1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Wyo. 1943).

Where deceased employee at time of accident was driving employer's car at a rate in excess of 80 miles per hour and had deliberately and repeatedly violated a criminal statute designed for the safety of the traveling public as well as his own, he was guilty of culpable negligence. Under such circumstances compensation was barred to the dependents of the deceased employee. Weidt v. Brannan Motor Co., 72 Wyo. 1, 260 P.2d 757,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1953).

Dependents of deceased employee who was riding in automobile donated by employer and driven by coemployee were not deprived of compensation for death of deceased employee, though accident was due to culpable negligence of coemployee and deceased employee knew that coemployee was a reckless driver. Weidt v. Brannan Motor Co., 72 Wyo. 1, 260 P.2d 757,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1953).

Culpable negligence is misconduct that exposes the injured worker to serious danger; this misconduct must be willful, that is, done purposely, with knowledge or of such a character as to evince a reckless disregard of consequences. Barnette v. Doyle, 622 P.2d 1349,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 278

(Wyo. 1981).

Ordinary negligence

can never be serious misconduct, much less willful misconduct and no conduct which is thoughtless, heedless, inadvertent or of the moment, and none which arises from error of judgment, can be willful or serious misconduct. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203, 1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Wyo. 1943).

Willful misconduct is question of fact. —

What is willful misconduct in workmen's compensation case is primarily question of fact and each case must be weighed and determined by its own circumstances. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203, 1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Wyo. 1943).

Every violation of statute or public regulation, or rule, regulation, order or instruction does not constitute willful and serious misconduct. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203, 1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Wyo. 1943).

Employer's negligence considered. —

When negligence of workman is culpable, employer's conduct may become proper subject of inquiry in deciding whether his negligence was a contributing cause of injury. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203, 1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Wyo. 1943).

Where coal mine operator failed to provide holes for shelter and 22-inch clearance in haulage-way as required by statute, death of miner resulting from his violation of employer's rule against entering haulage-way did not render employer liable. Hamilton v. Swigart Coal Mine, 59 Wyo. 485, 143 P.2d 203, 1943 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Wyo. 1943).

Appropriation to widow of peace officer killed in performance of his duty

was not invalid as donation to an individual. State ex rel. McPherren v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 22, 215 P. 477,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1923).

Derivative claims. —

Supreme Court of Wyoming finds that emotional distress claims are direct claims between the alleged tortfeasor and the injured party, are not derivative of the associated covered injury or death, and are not necessarily barred by worker's compensation immunity; and the Supreme Court overrules Anderson v. Solvay Minerals, Inc., 3 P.3d 236 (Wyo. 2000), to the extent it holds to the contrary. Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18, 366 P.3d 521,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2016).

Extrahazardous activities. —

As a general rule, if the employer does not engage in extrahazardous activities, then whether an individual employee's activities are hazardous in nature is not material. Gonzales v. Grass Valley Mobile Home Park, 933 P.2d 484,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Under former §

27-14-108

(h)(v)(F), the operator of a mobile home park, along with its custodial and maintenance employees, was excluded from mandatory workers' compensation coverage for extrahazardous activities. Gonzales v. Grass Valley Mobile Home Park, 933 P.2d 484,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Matter of workmen's compensation schedule is one for legislature,

not the courts. Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

The legislature is the one that has the power to attach conditions to the payments made under workmen's compensation statutes, even though a condition affects an amount recovered from a third party. Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

Former section under which it was held that the state industrial accident fund would not share the expense of attorney's fees in third party recovery by an injured workman was not in violation of this section, authorizing the creation of workmen's compensation. Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95, 1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317 (Wyo. 1977).

Contributing employer's immunity is absolute

regardless of whether its behavior amounted to culpable negligence or an intentional tort. Wessel v. Mapco, Inc., 752 P.2d 1363,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. Apr. 26, 1988).

Single employer paying through joint account entitled to immunity. —

A single employer that makes its payments to the worker's compensation fund through a joint account entered into with other affiliated business entities is considered to have made its contributions as required by law and is entitled to the immunity set forth in the worker's compensation laws. Lankford v. True Ranches, 822 P.2d 868,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1991).

Immunity not available to parent company. —

Immunity from suit based on worker's compensation laws is not available to the parent company (of the subsidiary corporation-employer) that does not contribute to the fund. Fiscus v. Atlantic Richfield Co., 742 P.2d 198,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1987).

Parent corporation liable if exercises operational control. —

A parent corporation, as not being an employer contributing to the fund, may be liable in tort if it exercises operational control of activities of its subsidiary. Wessel v. Mapco, Inc., 752 P.2d 1363,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. Apr. 26, 1988).

Only justifiable way to abrogate Wyoming workmen's compensation provisions,

and the exclusive remedy thereunder, is by the existence of a written contract of indemnity against the employer. Shields v. Bechtel Power Corp., 439 F. Supp. 192, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13605 (D. Wyo. 1977).

Claim for contribution against employer was improper. —

Plaintiff's employer, from whom plaintiff had already collected workmen's compensation benefits as a result of his injuries, was not jointly or severally liable in tort to the plaintiff, and a claim for contribution against it was improper. Shields v. Bechtel Power Corp., 439 F. Supp. 192, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13605 (D. Wyo. 1977).

State not vicariously liable to employee killed by culpable negligence of coemployee. —

Insofar as the estate of a state employee, killed in an automobile mishap in the scope of his employment by reason of the culpable negligence of a coemployee, sought to hold the state vicariously liable, the estate failed by reasons of the exclusive-remedy provisions of the worker's compensation law. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

But state may be sued for indemnification. —

The worker's compensation exclusive-remedy constitutional and statutory provisions did not deny standing to a state employee, held liable for his culpably negligent acts while acting within the scope of his employment, to bring suit against the state under §

1-39-104

for indemnification, even though the employee was receiving benefits from the worker's compensation fund. Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Worker's incarceration does not require a suspension of temporary total disability payments.

Benefits under § 27-14-404(d) terminate only when the worker recovers, because only then does he regain his earning power. Incarceration does not restore a disabled worker's earning power. In re Injury to Spera, 713 P.2d 1155,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1986).

Worker's compensation not bar to third-party claims for indemnity. —

Because a third-party claim for indemnity is not based on the employee's injury, as it is based on — “by reason of” — “on account of” — the alleged breach of an independent duty owed by the employer to the third party, and because third parties, seeking indemnity, received no benefits from passage of the worker's compensation provisions, and, therefore, should not be held to have impliedly given up any rights, the worker's compensation provisions do not bar third-party claims for indemnity. Pan Am. Petroleum Corp. v. Maddux Well Serv., 586 P.2d 1220,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1978).

A contract entered into between an employer and a contractor, pertaining to a well for oil or gas, which provided that the employer would indemnify the contractor for all loss it might sustain as a result of the employer's work under the contract except such loss as might be caused by the sole negligence of the contractor, was enforceable by the contractor — who was sued by the employer's employee, who suffered injury during the course of his employment and was granted worker's compensation — against the employer to the extent of any damage suffered because of the sole or concurrent negligence of the employer. Cities Serv. Co. v. Northern Prod. Co., 705 P.2d 321,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1985).

Valid for employee and employer to stipulate amount of payable benefits. —

A stipulation entered into between an employee and his employer settling the amount of worker's compensation benefits the employer would pay for the employee's injury was valid. In re Injury to Lea, 707 P.2d 754,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 592

(Wyo. 1985).

Written settlement stipulation, acquiesced to by court, constitutional. —

A settlement stipulation, acquiesced to by the district court, although no order was entered expressly approving the stipulation, and the accompanying orders of award were judicial determinations to be accorded finality. The worker was not entitled to reopen the case, as the written stipulation did not violate constitutional and statutory provisions prohibiting contractual devices to relieve an employer from a liability created by the worker's compensation laws. Further, the worker was not entitled to a hearing on his petition to reopen the case, as there was no factual dispute, the petition being subject to dismissal by operation of a legal bar. Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 715 P.2d 553,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 509

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Jordan v. Delta Drilling Co., 541 P.2d 39,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 169

, 78 A.L.R.3d 1215 (Wyo. 1975); Venes v. Heck, 642 F.2d 380,

1981 U.S. App. LEXIS 19846

(10th Cir. 1981); Mauch v. Stanley Structures, Inc., 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982); Cottonwood Steel Corp. v. Hansen, 655 P.2d 1226,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1982); Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139, 1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496 (Wyo. 1985); Stratman v. Admiral Beverage Corp., 760 P.2d 974,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Brown v. State ex rel. Morgan, 79 Wyo. 355, 334 P.2d 502,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1959); Mauler v. Titus, 697 P.2d 303,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 465

(Wyo. 1985); Carson v. Wyoming State Penitentiary, 735 P.2d 424,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 419

(Wyo. 1987); Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987); State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Comp. Div. v. Medina, 770 P.2d 1104,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1989); Griess v. Consolidated Freightways Corp., 776 P.2d 752,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1989); White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989); Stuart v. Colo. Interstate Gas Co.,

2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 25246

, 271 F.3d 1221 (10th Cir. 2001); Appleby v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 84, 47 P.3d 613,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Bowers v. Getter Trucking Co., 514 P.2d 837,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1973).

Cited

in

Parsons v. Roussalis, 488 P.2d 1050,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1971); Griffith ex rel. Workmen's Comp. Dep't v. Stephenson, 494 P.2d 546,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1972); Bence v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 631 P.2d 13,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1981); Tader v. Tader, 737 P.2d 1065,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1987); Bridge v. Eisenman Transp., Inc., 742 P.2d 768,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 510

(Wyo. 1987); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988); Lesh v. Allstate Ins. Co., 723 F. Supp. 624, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12514 (D. Wyo. 1989); Seckman v. Wyo-Ben, Inc., 783 P.2d 161,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1989); Allen v. Natrona County Sch. Dist. No. One, 811 P.2d 1,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1991); Forni v. Pathfinder Mines, 834 P.2d 688,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1992); Cardwell v. American Linen Supply, 843 P.2d 596,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1992); McKennan v. Newman, 843 P.2d 602,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1992); Keck v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 985 P.2d 430,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1999); Bertagnolli v. Louderback, 2003 WY 50, 67 P.3d 627,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2003); Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 7, 105 P.3d 101,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(2005); Perry v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Perry), 2006 WY 61, 134 P.3d 1242,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. May 16, 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Assaults by Fellow Employees in Workmen's Compensation Cases,” see 7 Wyo. L.J. 207.

For comment, “The Constitutionality of Automobile Compensation Plans in Wyoming,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1970).

For comment, “The Faults in No-Fault Insurance Plans,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 771 (1971).

For case note, “Exclusivity Provisions of the Worker's Compensation Act as a Bar to Third-Party Actions Against Employers. Pan American Petroleum Corp. v. Maddux Well Service, 586 P.2d 1220,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 587 (1979).

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Constitutionality of Wyoming's Co-employee Immunity Statute under Article 10, Section 4, of the Wyoming Constitution.Meyer v. Kendig, 641 P.2d 1235,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 355 (1983).

For comment, “Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: The Boys Who Cry ‘Wolf,’” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 203 (1986).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — Using the Exclusive Remedy Provision as a Shield for an Employer's Intentional Acts Against Employees. Baker v. Wendy's of Montana, Inc., 687 P.2d 885,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1984),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 603 (1986).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

For article, “The Law of Indemnity in Wyoming: Unravelling the Confusion,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 811 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to arms and hands, 12 ALR4th 96.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to, or conditions induced in, sexual organs and processes, 13 ALR4th 183.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to legs and feet, 13 ALR4th 212.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to back, neck, or spine, 15 ALR4th 294.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to, or conditions induced in, respiratory system, 15 ALR4th 519.

Loss of enjoyment of life as a distinct element or factor in awarding damages for bodily injury, 34 ALR4th 293.

Modern status of intentional infliction of mental distress as independent tort; “outrage,” 38 ALR4th 998.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for personal injuries resulting in death of homemaker, 47 ALR4th 100.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for personal injuries resulting in death of persons engaged in trades and manual occupations, 47 ALR4th 134.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of damages awarded for personal injuries resulting in death of retired persons, 48 ALR4th 229.

Excessiveness and adequacy of damages for personal injuries resulting in death of minor, 49 ALR4th 1076.

Future disease or condition, or anxiety relating thereto, as element of recovery, 50 ALR4th 13.

Damages for breach of contract as affected by income tax considerations, 50 ALR4th 452.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for personal injuries resulting in death of persons engaged in professional, white-collar and nonmanual occupations, 50 ALR4th 787.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for noneconomic loss caused by personal injury or death of parent, 61 ALR4th 251.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for noneconomic loss caused by personal injury or death of spouse, 61 ALR4th 309.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for parents' noneconomic loss caused by personal injury or death of child, 61 ALR4th 413.

Recoverability of compensatory damages for mental anguish or emotional distress for tortiously causing another's birth, 74 ALR4th 798.

Recovery of damages for loss of consortium resulting from death of child—modern status, 77 ALR4th 411.

Right to prejudgment interest on punitive or multiple damages awards, 9 ALR5th 63.

Sufficiency of evidence to prove future medical expenses as result of injury to back, neck or spine, 26 ALR5th 401.

Wrongful death damages for loss of expectancy of inheritance from decedent, 42 ALR5th 465.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to trunk or torso, or internal injuries, 48 ALR5th 129.

Valuing damages in personal injury actions awarded for gratuitously rendered nursing and medical care, 49 ALR5th 685.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to head or brain, 50 ALR5th 1.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for injuries to nerves or nervous system, 51 ALR5th 467.

Limitations of liability of air carrier for personal injury or death, 91 ALR Fed 547.